Hawaii statutes.
§601-4 Judicial council. The supreme
court shall provide for the appointment of a judicial council which shall serve
in an advisory capacity only. The judicial council shall give continuing
consideration to the administration of justice in the courts of the State. It
shall make reports and recommendations biennially to the supreme court and also
whenever deemed advisable by the court. The chief justice shall be a member
and chairperson of the judicial council. The supreme court shall appoint, from
time to time, such number of other members as it deems necessary to be fairly
representative, but not to exceed fifteen, whose terms shall be in accordance
with the rules of the supreme court. The members of the judicial council shall
include laypersons as well as judges and lawyers. The members of the judicial
council shall receive no compensation for their service but they shall be
reimbursed for their traveling and other expenses incidental to attending
meetings. [L 1959, c 259, pt of §1(b); Supp, §213-1.7; HRS §601-4; gen ch 1993]

Cross References

Ethics commission, appointment, see §84-21.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next